test/tools/fsmbook-tests/xfst-scripts/BrazilianPortuguese2.xfst.script
define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u 
              | á | é | í | ó | ú
        | â | ê |     ô
        | ã |         õ
        | à
        |                 ü
        ] ;

define Rule1 [ s -> z || Vowel _ Vowel ];

define Rule2 [ ç -> s ];

define Rule3 [ c h -> %$ ];

define Rule4 [ c -> s || _ [ e | i | é | í | ê ] ];

define Rule5 [ c -> k ];

define Rule6 [ s s -> s ];

define Rule7 [ n h -> N ];

define Rule8 [ l h -> L ];

define Rule9 [ h -> 0 ];

define Rule10 [ r r -> R ];

define Rule11 [ r -> R || .#. _ ];

define Rule12 [ e -> i || _ (s) .#. , .#. p _ r ];

define Rule13 [ o -> u || _ (s) .#. ];

define Rule14 [ d -> J || _ [ i | í ] ];

define Rule15 [ t -> C || _ [ i | í ] ];

define Rule16 [ z -> s || _ .#. ];

# debugging..
push Rule1
push Rule2
push Rule3
push Rule4
push Rule5
push Rule6
push Rule7
push Rule8
push Rule9
push Rule10
push Rule11
push Rule12
push Rule13
push Rule14
push Rule15
push Rule16
write prolog > Rules
clear stack

# Rule10: differences in results from xfst and hfst-xfst (openfst-tropical)

read regex Rule1 .o. Rule2 .o. Rule3 .o. Rule4 .o. Rule5 .o. Rule6 .o.
           Rule7 .o. Rule8 .o. Rule9 .o. Rule10 .o. Rule11 .o. Rule12 .o.
           Rule13 .o. Rule14 .o. Rule15 .o. Rule16 ; 

write prolog > Result
